Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201859-1403.04
Department of Revenue; duties.

The Department of Revenue shall inform proprietors of their rights and responsibilities regarding the public performance of copyrighted music as part of the business licensing service.

Laws 2018, LB1120, § 36.
July 19, 2018